Mississippi, session 2026, SB2208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  Study committee established.  (a)  There is hereby created the Mississippi Public University System Governance Study Committee to conduct a comprehensive review of the system-level architecture and governance structure of Mississippi's public institutions of higher learning.  The committee shall evaluate, at a minimum, whether the current governance framework best supports: (i)  Clear lines of authority, responsibility and accountability among system-level governing bodies, institution-level governing boards and executive leadership; (ii)  Efficient and effective use of state appropriations and other public resources, including the minimization of unnecessary duplication, fragmentation or misalignment of administrative, academic and capital investments across institutions; (iii)  Improved and measurable student outcomes, including increased access, retention, timely degree completion and successful transition into the workforce or advanced education; (iv)  Data-informed, outcome-driven decision-making, with governance structures that support the use of performance metrics, benchmarking and continuous improvement; (v)  Strategic statewide planning and coordination that aligns academic offerings, enrollment strategies, facilities planning and workforce development with Mississippi's long-term economic and demographic needs; (vi)  Institutional effectiveness and operational efficiency, while preserving appropriate mission differentiation, academic quality and institutional identity; (vii)  Transparency in governance, budgeting and policy implementation, ensuring that policymakers and the public can clearly evaluate institutional performance and return on investment; (viii) Responsiveness and adaptability to changing demographic trends, enrollment pressures, labor market demands and fiscal constraints; (ix)  Balanced governance structure that appropriately allocates authority between system-level oversight and institution-level decision-making; (x)  Sustained improvement in statewide postsecondary attainment, workforce readiness and economic competitiveness through governance models designed to deliver successful outcomes; (xi)  Whether governance authority is appropriately aligned with institutional responsibility, such that entities held accountable for student outcomes, financial performance and strategic execution possess sufficient decision-making authority to act effectively; (xii)  The proximity of governing authority to institutional operations, including whether governance structures enable timely, informed and responsive decision-making at the campus level; (xiii)  The efficiency, timeliness and effectiveness of governance processes, including the impact of system-level approval requirements on academic innovation, partnerships, capital planning and operational flexibility; (xiv)  The extent to which the current governance framework supports or constrains mission differentiation and regional responsiveness, including alignment with local workforce and economic development needs; (xv)  Comparative governance outcomes across states utilizing centralized system boards and institution-level governing boards, with respect to efficiency, enrollment stability, completion rates and fiscal performance; (xvi)  The value added by system-level governance functions, including whether such functions demonstrably improve coordination, reduce duplication or enhance outcomes relative to alternative governance structures; (xvii)  Board composition, size, expertise and capacity, including whether governing bodies possess the skills and experience necessary to oversee complex modern institutions of higher education; (xviii)  The administrative, financial and opportunity costs associated with centralized governance, including overhead, compliance burden and delayed decision-making; (xix)  The clarity of accountability for institutional performance, including whether responsibility for outcomes is clearly assigned or diffused across multiple governing entities; (xx)  The capacity of governance structures to foster innovation, external partnerships and entrepreneurial activity, particularly in response to workforce, research and regional development priorities; and (xxi)  Whether alternative governance architectures could better support institutional agility, accountability and performance, while preserving appropriate statewide coordination, fiscal oversight and public accountability. (b)  In carrying out its duties, the committee shall: (i)  Review the current constitutional and statutory framework governing Mississippi's public institutions of higher learning, including the structure, authority and responsibilities of system-level and institution-level governing bodies; (ii)  Examine the allocation of decision-making authority and accountability within the current governance framework and assess whether authority is aligned with responsibility for outcomes; (iii)  Evaluate the efficiency and effectiveness of system-level governance functions, including oversight of academic programs, budgeting, capital planning, facilities development and strategic coordination; (iv)  Assess the impact of governance structures on institutional agility, including the speed and flexibility of decision-making related to academic offerings, workforce partnerships, research initiatives and operational innovation; (v)  Examine whether the current governance framework supports mission differentiation and regional responsiveness, including alignment with local and statewide workforce and economic development needs; (vi)  Analyze the administrative and financial costs associated with centralized governance, including overhead, compliance requirements and opportunity costs, as compared to alternative governance models; (vii)  Study national models of public university system architecture and governance, including, but not limited to, those utilized in Florida and Tennessee, with specific attention to: 1.  The role and authority of system boards versus institution-level governing boards; 2. Appointment authority, composition and expertise of governing boards; 3.  Allocation of powers related to budgeting, academic programs, capital planning and executive leadership; and 4. Accountability mechanisms tied to institutional performance and outcomes. (viii)  Compare governance outcomes across states using different system architectures, including measures of efficiency, enrollment trends, completion rates, cost per degree and workforce alignment; (ix)  Solicit and consider input from stakeholders, including public universities, governing boards, faculty, students, employers and higher education policy experts; (x)  Identify statutory or constitutional provisions that may limit alternative governance architectures and evaluate whether amendments to state law or the Mississippi Constitution should be considered; and (xi)  Review any other matters related to public university system architecture, governance effectiveness, efficiency and accountability that the committee deems appropriate. (2)  Composition of the committee.  (a)  The committee shall be composed of the following members: (i)  The Chairmen of the Universities and Colleges Committees of the Mississippi State Senate and the Mississippi House of Representatives, or their designees from among their respective committee memberships; (ii)  The Chairman of the Appropriations Committees of the Mississippi State Senate and the Mississippi House of Representatives, or their designees from among their respective committee memberships; (iii)  The Chairman of the Finance Committee of the Mississippi State Senate, or his or her designee from among the committee's membership; (iv)  The Chairman of the Ways and Means Committee of the Mississippi House of Representatives, or his or her designee from among the committee's membership; (v)  The Director of the University Research Center and State Economist, or his or her designee; (vi)  One (1) individual appointed by the Governor who is a graduate of a Mississippi public institution of higher learning and has significant experience in business, finance or organizational governance; (vii)  One (1) individual appointed by the Lieutenant Governor who is a graduate of a Mississippi public institution of higher learning and has significant experience in leadership, policy or administration; (viii)  One (1) individual appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives who has experience in workforce development, economic development or public administration; (ix)  One (1) individual appointed by the Governor who is a graduate of a Mississippi HBCU and who has experience in workforce development, economic development or public administration; (x)  One (1) individual appointed by the Lieutenant Governor who is a graduate of a Mississippi HBCU and who has experience in workforce development, economic development or public administration; and (xi)  One (1) individual appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives who is a graduate of a Mississippi HBCU and who has experience in workforce development, economic development or public administration. (b)  Appointments to the committee shall be made within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this act. (3)  Committee organization and responsibilities.  (a)  The committee shall meet within forty-five (45) days of the effective date of this act at a meeting to be jointly called by the Chairmen of the Universities and Colleges Committees of the Mississippi State Senate and House of Representatives.  At its first meeting, the committee shall: (i)  Elect a chairperson and vice-chairperson from among its members; and (ii)  Establish rules for transacting business and keeping records. (b)  The committee shall meet as necessary and report its written findings and recommendations to the Legislature no later than December 1, 2026.  Such report may include recommendations for statutory changes and constitutional amendments, where appropriate. (c)  A majority of committee members shall constitute a quorum for conducting business, voting and adopting the final report. (d)  Meetings shall be held at the State Capitol Building; however, if it is not feasible for members to meet in person, the committee may convene by an online meeting platform accessible to the public. (4)  Support and cooperation.  (a)  The Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) shall provide necessary staff and administrative support to the committee, as well as prepare the final written report of the committee. (b)  In addition, the Board of Trustees of the State Institutions of Higher Learning, its member institutions and the University Research Center may provide additional staff and administrative support to the committee upon request and subject to available resources. (c)  To achieve its objectives, the committee may request data, analysis and assistance from any state agency, division or political subdivision. (5)  Compensation of committee members.  (a)  Legislative members of the study committee shall be entitled to per diem and reimbursement of expenses in accordance with Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972. (b)  Nonlegislative members shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary travel expenses from any available funds designated for such purposes. (6)  Dissolution of the committee.  The committee shall be dissolved on January 1, 2027, or upon the submission of its final report, whichever is earlier. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.